Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.270

Family assessment—Recommendation of services.

(1) Within ten days of the conclusion of the family assessment, the department must meet with the child's parent or guardian to discuss the recommendation for services to address child safety concerns or significant risk of subsequent child maltreatment.

(2) If the parent or guardian disagrees with the department's recommendation regarding the provision of services, the department shall convene a family team decision-making meeting to discuss the recommendations and objections. The caseworker's supervisor and area administrator shall attend the meeting.

(3) If the department determines, based on the results of the family assessment, that services are not recommended then the department shall close the family assessment response case.

[ 2012 c 259 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 259 ss 1 and 3-10: See note following RCW 26.44.020.